California statutes. Public Resources Code
 occurring in, or arising out of an activity in, a state park system unit that is designated as closed by the department pursuant to subdivision (a), except for conduct that constitutes gross negligence or is wanton or reckless. This immunity shall apply notwithstanding the fact that the public has access, whether invited or uninvited, to the state park system unit, and notwithstanding that the department may take actions such as patrols, inspections, maintenance, and repairs necessary to protect the state park system unit facilities and resources from deterioration, damage, or destruction. This immunity shall apply only to units of the state park system that are designated as closed pursuant to subdivision (a) and shall not apply to units that are partially closed or subject to service reductions but not closure. The closed units shall be maintained in a list by the department and the list shall be made publicly available and posted on the department’s Internet Web site. The list shall include the date the
 unit is considered closed. The immunity provided by this subdivision does not limit any other immunity or immunities available to a public entity or a public employee. The governmental immunity provided in this section does not apply to a third party or entity that has reopened a park listed as closed pursuant to subdivision (a). The immunity shall continue to apply to the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 407, Sec. 2.   (AB 594)   Effective September 28, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5007.1.

(a) Lands purchased or otherwise acquired by the department at the Pan Pacific project, which are to be operated and maintained by other public agencies under agreements entered into pursuant to Section 5080.30, shall not be subject to Section 5002.1, 5002.2, 5002.3, or 5002.4, or Article 1.7 (commencing with Section 5019.50), during the term of those agreements. Any facility to be developed on those lands shall only be constructed in accordance with a development plan approved by the director.

(b) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that public use facilities
 are being contemplated as one of the alternatives for the Pan Pacific project in the aftermath of the recent fire, and that the standard 20-year term authorized by law is insufficient to enable any concessionaire to amortize the type and scale of improvements that may be constructed. Accordingly, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5080.18, the term of any concession contract may be for a period not to exceed 66 years if the contract provides that the rent shall be reviewed and adjusted at least every 10 years, but not more often than every five years, to reflect market rates and conditions prevailing in the area in which the concession is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 620, Sec. 2.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5007.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a contract for services under the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to restore artifacts at the Hearst San Simeon State Historical Monument is exempt from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 173, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5007.3.

(a) In planning, developing, managing, and operating lands acquired for the Citrus Heritage Park at Mockingbird Canyon, the department and the State Park and Recreation Commission shall adhere to the following requirements:

(1) Vehicular and other public access shall be restricted to Dufferin Avenue between Van Buren Boulevard and Jackson Street.

(2) Interior roads, pathways, and attractions within the park shall be located so as to minimize opportunities for trespass onto adjoining
 nonpark properties, and fencing shall be installed in areas subject to high visitor usage.

(3) Lands within the park that are upstream of Mockingbird Reservoir shall be managed as wildlife habitat and open space, and no facilities for the use of the general public shall be constructed on those lands.

(4) A program of pest management shall be immediately undertaken in citrus groves, as they are acquired by the state, to prevent the spread of pests to nonstate property, and the citrus groves shall be managed so as to preserve them in a healthy and productive state.

(b) For the purposes of rationalizing the boundaries of the Citrus Heritage Park, the City of Riverside shall offer for sale, at fair market value, all of Parcel No. 238-050-003-5 to an adjoining property owner. If no adjoining property owner purchases that
 parcel, the city shall transfer title to that parcel to the state, as provided in proviso (6) of Item 3790-301-721 of the Budget Act of 1982 (Chapter 326, Statutes 1982).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 879, Sec. 1.   Effective September 10, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5007.4.

Consistent with the general plan for the unit, the department may enter into an operating agreement, at no cost to the state, with a qualified nonprofit organization for the California Citrus State Historic Park for purposes to include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) Managing and maintaining agricultural production.

(b) Leasing individual groves for the purpose of managing and maintaining agricultural production.

(c) Selling citrus fruit and fruit products
 at the park.

(d) Using the proceeds of those sales for financing facilities and programs at the park.

(e) Accepting and spending donations of money for facilities and programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 620, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

5007.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department shall have the right to remove and dispose of all floating logs, timber, lumber, and other debris deposited on public beaches, waterways or lands within the state park system, when such deposits create a hazard or impediment to the public safety, enjoyment, and use of the public beach, waterway or land.

Logs, timber or lumber which are capable of being identified as the property of another shall be held by the department for a period of three months from the time of their removal from any public beach, waterway or land.

The owner of
 such property may remove it on payment or tendering to the department the amount of the damages which the department has sustained by reason of the drifting of the property upon the public beaches, waterways or lands within the state park system and which may accrue in removal of the property.

If the property remains unclaimed after the three months period the department may dispose of such logs, timber or lumber by destruction, sale or use.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5007.1 by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1065.)
-------------------------------------------

5008.

(a) The department shall protect the state park system and the state vehicular recreation area and trail system from damage and preserve the peace therein.

(b) The director may designate any officer or employee of the department as a peace officer. The primary duties of the peace officer shall be the enforcement of this division, Sections 4442
 and 4442.5, the rules and regulations of the department, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 650) of Division 3 of the Harbors and Navigation Code, the rules and regulations of the Division of Boating and Waterways within the department, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 9850) of Division 3.5 of the Vehicle Code, and Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000) of the Vehicle Code and to arrest persons for the commission of public offenses within the property under its jurisdiction. The authority and powers of the peace officer shall be limited to those conferred by law upon peace officers listed in Section 830.2 of the Penal Code.

(c) The department shall protect property included in the California recreational trail system and the property included in the recreational trail system under Section 6 of Chapter 1234 of the Statutes of 1980 from damage and preserve the peace therein. The primary duties of any officer or employee designated a
 peace officer under this section shall include enforcement of the rules and regulations established by the department and the arrest of persons for the commission of public offenses within the property included in the recreational trail system under Section 6 of Chapter 1234 of the Statutes of 1980.

(d) Any person who violates the rules and regulations established by the department is guilty of either a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding 90 days, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment, or an infraction punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 499, Sec. 6.   (SB 795)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5008.1.

(a) When it is determined by the director to be in the public interest, and subject to the fees, rules, and regulations of the department, visitors to units of the state park system may bring animals into those units.

(b) Any animal brought into a state park system unit pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be under the immediate control of the visitor or shall be confined, and under no circumstance shall the animal be permitted to do any of the following:

(1) Pose a threat to public safety and welfare.

(2) Create a public nuisance.

(3) Pose a threat to the natural or cultural resources of the unit or to the improvements at the unit.

(c) The department may require a person bringing an animal into a state park system unit pursuant to subdivision (a) to provide proof of appropriate immunizations and valid licenses.

(d) This section does not apply to dogs used to lawfully pursue game in season at units of the state park system where hunting is allowed.

(e) No later than July 1, 2020, the department shall establish and
 maintain on its Internet Web site a comprehensive, up-to-date list of each state park system unit with information on whether the unit or a portion of the unit allows dogs and additional information that may include, but is not limited to, the specific areas of the unit in which dogs are allowed and the total miles of trail in the unit that are open to dogs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 908, Sec. 1.   (AB 1762)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5008.2.

(a) Peace officers and other designated employees of the department may capture any animal (1) which is not confined or under the immediate control of a person visiting the unit, (2) which poses a threat to public safety and welfare, to the natural or cultural resources of the unit, or to the improvements at the unit, or (3) which is a public nuisance.

(b) Peace officers may dispatch any animal which poses an immediate or continuing threat (1) to public safety and welfare or (2) to wildlife at the unit.

(c) Owners of animals with identification that have been captured or dispatched pursuant to this section shall be notified within 72 hours after capture or dispatch.

(d) This section does not apply to dogs used to lawfully pursue game in season at units of the State Park System where hunting is permitted.

(e) The authority conferred by this section on peace officers or designated employees of the department may only be exercised on or about property owned, operated, controlled, or administered by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 750, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5008.4.

Moneys deposited in the State Parks and Recreation Fund pursuant to Section 1463.02 of the Penal Code are available, when appropriated by the Legislature, only for the following purposes:

(a) The payment of refunds of fines and forfeitures determined by the Controller to have been erroneously deposited in the fund.

(b) The training of department employees in the Ranger/Lifeguard classification, including, but not limited to, resource
 management and protection, law enforcement, interpretation, first aid, cardiopulmonary resuscitation and medical technical training, subject to all of the following:

(1) Reimbursement for training under the section shall not exceed the reimbursement rates of the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, but reimbursements for salaries may be up to 100 percent of actual costs.

(2) Reimbursements for salaries shall be allocated to the assigned work locations of the employees receiving training to be used for salary or overtime payments for rangers and lifeguards assigned to those work locations.

(3) Expenditures under this subdivision in any fiscal year shall not exceed 90 percent of the moneys on deposit on June 30 of the preceding fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 320, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5008.5.

In any prosecution charging a violation within any unit of the state park system of the rules and regulations of the department, Section 655.2 or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 650) of Division 3 of the Harbors and Navigation Code, or the rules and regulations of the Division of Boating and Waterways within the department, proof by the people of the State of California that the vehicle or vessel described in the complaint
 was parked or placed in violation of any provision of these statutes or rules and regulations together with proof that the defendant named in the complaint was, at the time of the parking or placing, the registered owner of the vehicle or vessel, shall constitute prima facie evidence that the registered owner of the vehicle or vessel was the person who parked or placed the vehicle or vessel at the point where, and for the time during which, the violation occurred, but the proof that a person is the registered owner of a vehicle or vessel is not prima facie evidence that the person has violated any other provision of law. The above provisions shall apply only when there has been compliance with the procedure required by Article 3 (commencing with Section 40200) of Chapter 1 of Division 17 of the Vehicle Code. Proof of a written lease of, or rental agreement for, a particular vehicle or vessel described in the complaint, on the date and time of the violation, which lease or rental agreement includes the name
 and address of the person to whom the vehicle or vessel is leased or rented, shall rebut the prima facie evidence that the registered owner was the person who parked or placed the vehicle at the time and place where the violation occurred.

Any charge under this section shall be dismissed when the person charged has made a bona fide sale or transfer of the vehicle or vessel and has delivered possession thereof to the purchaser and has complied with the requirements of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 5602 of the Vehicle Code or with Section 710 of the Harbors and Navigation Code prior to the date of the alleged violation and has advised the court of the name and address of the purchaser.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 113, Sec. 5.   (AB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5008.6.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the judge before whom any person is tried for a violation of any provision of this code within the jurisdiction of the department, or regulation adopted pursuant thereto, may, upon the conviction of the accused, order the forfeiture of any device or apparatus which is designed to and capable of injuring or killing any person or animal or capturing any animal and which was used in committing the offense charged. The department shall either sell or destroy any device or apparatus so forfeited. The proceeds from all sales shall be paid into the State Parks and Recreation Fund, segregated with the money deposited
 pursuant to Section 5008.4, and available only for the purposes of Section 5008.4. For purposes of this section, forfeiture of bail is a conviction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 761, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

5008.7.

Every person convicted of a violation of any rule or regulation adopted by the department pursuant to this division prohibiting the leaving, depositing, dropping, or scattering of bottles, broken glass, ashes, wastepaper, cans, or other rubbish in any unit of the state park system shall be punished by a mandatory fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) upon a first conviction, by a mandatory fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) upon a second conviction, and by a mandatory fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) nor more than one
 thousand dollars ($1,000) upon a third or subsequent conviction.

The court may, in addition to the fine imposed upon a conviction, require as a condition of probation, in addition to any other condition of probation, that any person convicted of a violation of this section pick up litter at a time and place within the jurisdiction of the court for not less than eight hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 133, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

5008.8.

After January 1, 1989, every peace officer authorized pursuant to Section 5008, shall have satisfactorily completed, prior to the date he or she is first designated a peace officer, the basic training course established by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 523, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5008.10.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Cigar” has the same meaning as defined in Section 104550 of the Health and Safety Code and, for purposes of this section, may contain any other weed or plant as an alternative or supplement to tobacco or nicotine.

(2) “Cigarette” has the same meaning as defined in Section 104556 of the Health and Safety Code and, for purposes of this section, may contain any other weed or plant as an alternative or supplement to tobacco or nicotine.

(3) “Smoke” or “smoking” means
 inhaling, exhaling, burning, or carrying any lighted or heated cigar, cigarette, or pipe, or any other lighted or heated tobacco or plant product intended for inhalation, whether natural or synthetic, in any manner or in any form. “Smoke” or “smoking” includes the use of an electronic smoking device that creates an aerosol or vapor, in any manner or in any form, or the use of any oral smoking device for the purpose of circumventing a prohibition on smoking. “Smoke” or “smoking” does not include the use of a cigar, cigarette, or pipe, or any other lighted or heated tobacco or plant product used as a prop in a motion picture, television program, or similar filmed audiovisual work, provided filming is properly permitted by the California Film Commission, the active film set is closed to the general public, and any waste is immediately removed from the park. “Smoke” or “smoking” does not include the
 use of a cigar, cigarette, or pipe, or any other lighted or heated tobacco or plant product used in connection with the good faith practice of a religious belief or ceremony.

(4) “State beach” means a sand, cobble, or other natural area that is owned or operated by, or under the jurisdiction
 of, the department and that adjoins the ocean, a bay, or an estuary.

(5) “Unit of the state park system” means an area specified in Section 5002.

(b) A person shall not smoke on a state beach or in a unit of the state park system. This prohibition does not apply to paved roadways or parking facilities of a state beach or unit of the state park system.

(c) A person shall not dispose of used cigar or cigarette waste on a state beach or in a unit of the
 state park system unless the disposal of the cigar or cigarette waste is made in an appropriate waste receptacle.

(d) A person who violates this section is guilty of an infraction and shall be punished by a fine of up to twenty-five dollars ($25).

(e) The department shall develop and post signs at strategic locations, as determined by the director, of state beaches and units of the state park system operated by the department to provide notice of the smoking prohibition set forth in subdivision (b).

(f) An entity operating, pursuant to an agreement with the department, a state beach or unit of the state park system that is not operated by the department shall post signs approved by the department at strategic locations, as determined by the operating entity and approved by the department, to provide notice of the smoking prohibition set forth in subdivision (b).

(g) Subdivision (b) shall be enforced on a state beach and in a unit of the state park system only after signs have been posted at that state beach or unit of the state park system pursuant to subdivision (e) or (f), as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 761, Sec. 2.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5009.

The State Park Contingent Fund is continued in existence. All moneys collected or received from contractual agreements, donations, gifts, bequests, or local government appropriations for improvements or additions to the state park system, shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the contingent fund. All moneys deposited shall be used for the improvement, maintenance, operation, or administration of state parks,
 or the acquisition of additional lands and properties for the state park system, in accordance with the terms of the agreement, donation, gift, bequest, or local government appropriation from which the moneys are derived.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 136.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5009.1.

(a) (1) The department may enter into an agreement to accept funds from any person, educational institution, tribal government, corporation or other business entity, or organization for the maintenance, operation, restoration, repair, development, improvement, or enhancement of a designated state park system unit or facility, or for research, educational, interpretive, recreational, or visitor services provided on or for a designated state park system unit or facility. Any funds so received shall be deposited in a separate account in the State Park Contingent Fund. The funds received shall supplement, but not replace, existing resources for the maintenance, operation, restoration, repair, development, improvement, or enhancement of the unit or facility, or for
 establishing or enhancing park services provided to visitors. The department and the sponsoring or donating person, entity, government, or organization shall specify in the agreement the level of service that is to be performed.

(2) Each agreement entered into pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include a provision requiring the department to provide to the signatory of the agreement or his or her designee an accounting of all expenditures made from the donated funds until all of the donated funds have been expended. The accountings shall be provided on a quarterly basis unless a different frequency is agreed to by the parties to the agreement.

(b) The department may enter into an agreement to accept from any person, educational institution, tribal government, corporation or other business entity, or organization services for the cleanup, repair, development, improvement, restoration,
 or enhancement of any designated state park system unit or facility, or for research, educational, interpretive, recreational, or visitor services provided on or for a state park system unit or facility. Under the direction of the department, these services shall supplement, but not replace, existing staff resources for the purpose of enhancing the maintenance and operation of the unit or facility or for establishing or enhancing park services provided to visitors.

(c) The director may authorize the erection of an appropriate sign in recognition of a donation or sponsorship provided in accordance with this section, consistent with existing law and with the rules and regulations of the department regarding signs in units of the state park system.

(d) The department may provide free or reduced-cost access to, and use of, park facilities to entities that have entered into agreements
 as described in this section, if the public benefit to be provided pursuant to the agreement exceeds or is of comparable value, as determined by the department, to the access to or use of park facilities granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 201, Sec. 11.   (AB 2549)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5009.2.

(a) The department may enter into an agreement to accept funds from any person, business entity, educational institution, tribal government, or organization for the maintenance, operation, restoration, repair, development, improvement, or enhancement of a state beach, any other unit of the state park system that encompasses a beach, or any area or facility of the state beach or other unit, or for research,
 educational, interpretive, recreational, or visitor services provided on or for a state beach, any other unit of the state park system that encompasses a beach, or any area or facility of the state beach or other unit. Any funds so received shall be deposited in a separate account in the State Park Contingent Fund. The funds received shall supplement, but not replace, existing resources for the purposes of enhancing the maintenance, operation, restoration, repair, development, improvement, or enhancement of the state beach, other unit of the state park system that encompasses a beach, or area or facility of the state beach or other unit, or for establishing or enhancing beach services provided to visitors. The department and the sponsoring or donating person, business entity, government, or organization may specify in the agreement the level of maintenance, operation, restoration, repair, development, improvement, or enhancement that will be performed.

(b) The department may also enter into an agreement to accept from any person, educational institution, tribal government, business entity, or organization services for the operation, restoration, repair, development, improvement, maintenance, or enhancement of a state beach, other unit of the state park system that encompasses a beach, or area or facility of the state beach or other unit, or for research, educational, interpretive, recreational, or visitor services provided on or for a state beach, other unit of the state park system that encompasses a beach, or area or facility of the state beach or other unit. Under the direction of the department, those services shall supplement, but not replace, existing staff resources for the purposes of operation, restoration, repair, development, improvement, maintenance, or enhancement of the state beach, other unit of the state park system that encompasses a beach, or area or facility of the state beach or other unit.

(c) The director may authorize the erection of an appropriate sign in recognition of a donation or sponsorship provided in accordance with this section, in accordance with department rules and regulations regarding signs in the state park system.

(d) The department may provide free or reduced-cost access to, and use of, beach facilities to entities that have entered into agreements as described in this section, if the public benefit to be provided pursuant to the agreement exceeds or is of comparable value, as determined by the department, to the access to or use of beach facilities granted.

(e) The activities authorized by this section shall be implemented as part of the department’s Adopt-A-Beach program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 559, Sec. 5.   (AB 549)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5009.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may enter into an agreement or agreements with private, nonprofit public benefit corporations or other private entities, as may be appropriate, to assist the department in its efforts to secure long-term private funding sources for any and all units of the state park system and to ensure that they are preserved and open for public use and enjoyment. The authority to enter into those agreements shall include, but not be limited to, securing donations, memberships, corporate and individual sponsorships, and
 marketing and licensing agreements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 472, Sec. 2.   Effective September 15, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5009.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Community access agreement” means an agreement entered into pursuant to this section that allows eligible entities to use property within the state park system and department personnel services to provide interpretive services and visitor services at units of the state parks system to underserved park users.

(2) “Eligible entity” means any of the following:

(A) A qualified nonprofit public benefit corporation organized pursuant to Part 2
 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(B) A federally recognized Native American tribe.

(C) A California Native American tribe listed on the California Tribal Consultation List maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission.

(3) “Interpretive services” means activities and programs that seek to help underserved park users to understand and connect with natural, cultural, and historic resources of the state park system and are not generally offered by the department.

(4) “Underserved park users” means populations who face barriers in accessing and using park services, and includes, but is not limited to,
 populations underserved because of geographic location, socioeconomic status, religion, special needs, such as language barriers, disabilities, immigration status, or age, sexual orientation, gender identity, and any other population determined to be underserved by the director.

(5) “Visitor services” means activities and programs that focus on facilitating opportunities for high-quality outdoor recreational services for underserved park users within a unit or units of the state park system.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the department, as a means of furthering its mission to expand access to state parks and outdoor recreation to all, and contingent upon the availability of its resources, may enter into community access agreements with eligible
 entities to provide interpretive services and visitor services at units of the state parks system to underserved park users.

(2) An eligible entity that enters into a community access agreement with the department shall deliver interpretive services and visitor services to underserved park users consistent with the mission of the department and the resource values of the unit or units of the state park system where the interpretive services or visitor services are to be held.

(c) The department, at its discretion, may provide department personnel services and space, if available, for an eligible entity’s outdoor equipment, services, or both, within a unit or units of the state park system.

(d) A community access agreement
 may include free or reduced-cost access to the eligible entity and members of the public participating in interpretive services and visitor services offered by the eligible entity at a unit or units of the state park system in furtherance of the agreement.

(e) All moneys collected or received by an eligible entity from interpretive services and visitor services provided pursuant to a community access agreement at a unit or units of the state park system shall be retained by or returned to the eligible entity.

(f) A community access agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall be a pilot project. The term of a community access agreement shall not exceed five years or the inoperative date of this section, whichever occurs first.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall provide a report to the Legislature on the implementation of this section on or before December 31, 2028. The report shall include all of the following information:

(A) A list of units of the state park system with community access agreements.

(B) A discussion of public benefits derived from community access agreements.

(C) An accounting of the revenues and expenditures incurred pursuant to each community access agreement.

(D) An assessment of the benefit to the state from community access agreements.

(E) Any other relevant information or data collected during the operation of community access agreements.

(2) A report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(h) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2029, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 831, Sec. 2.   (AB 1150)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5010.

(a) The department may collect fees, rents, and other returns for the use of any state park system area, the amounts to be determined by the department. The department may accept a credit card as a method of payment for fees collected through the department’s reservation system. Any contract executed by the department with credit card issuers or draft purchasers shall be consistent with Section 6159 of the Government Code. Notwithstanding Title 1.3 (commencing with Section 1747) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, the department may
 impose a surcharge in an amount to cover the cost of providing the reservation service, including reimbursement for any fee or discount charged by the credit card issuer.

(b) All revenues received by the department during each fiscal year shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the State Parks and Recreation Fund, which is hereby created.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), all revenues received by the department from the state vehicular recreation areas shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the Off-Highway Vehicle Trust Fund, as required by Section 38225 of the Vehicle Code.

(d) All revenues received by the department for the entry or launching of boats shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the State Parks and Recreation Fund and shall be used for boating safety,
 enforcement, operation, and maintenance programs of the department.

(e) On July 1, 1980, all existing balances, including unappropriated balances and encumbered and unencumbered balances, of the following funds and accounts shall be transferred to the State Parks and Recreation Fund:

(1) Park and Recreation Revolving Account (Section 5098, Public Resources Code, as added by Chapter 1222, Statutes of 1972).

(2) The Resources Protection Account (Section 8600, Public Resources Code, as added by Chapter 1052, Statutes of 1969).

(3) Collier Park Preservation Fund (Section 5010, Public Resources Code, as added by Chapter 1502, Statutes of 1974).

(4) San Francisco Maritime State Historic Park
 Account (Section 2, Chapter 1764, Statutes of 1971).

(5) State Park Highway Account, Bagley Conservation Fund (Section 2107.7, Streets and Highways Code, as added by Chapter 1032, Statutes of 1973).

(6) All funds received by the department pursuant to Division 21 (commencing with Section 31000).

(7) Hostel Facilities Use Fees Account (Section 2, Chapter 265, Statutes of 1974).

(8) All funds, other than expended funds, previously appropriated to the department from the Bagley Conservation Fund.

(f) On and after July 1, 1980, all funds, other than those specified in subdivisions (g) and (h), in the State Parks and Recreation Fund shall be available for expenditure for state park planning,
 acquisition, and development projects, operation of the state park system, and resource and property management and protection, when appropriated by the Legislature.

(g) All funds in the State Parks and Recreation Fund which had previously been appropriated and have become encumbered, may be used, without further appropriation, for liquidation of those encumbrances, upon the same terms and conditions as made by those previous appropriations.

(h) The balance of any unencumbered funds in the State Park Highway Account in the Bagley Conservation Fund shall be transferred to the State Parks and Recreation Fund and shall be available for expenditure as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 2107.7 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(i) All funds received by the Department of Parks and Recreation from the auction
 sales conducted pursuant to Section 2080.6 of the Civil Code shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the State Parks and Recreation Fund and shall be used for training department employees in the Ranger/Lifeguard classification, including, but not limited to, resource management and protection, law enforcement, interpretation, first aid, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and medical technical training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 908, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5010.1.

(a) All fees, rents, and other returns for the use of any state park system area are the property of the state or the public agency operating a state park system area pursuant to an agreement entered into pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 5080.30) of Chapter 1.2. However, whenever significant savings can be achieved by the department or the operating public agency, the department or the public agency may enter into a contract with a concessionaire, lessee, or other natural person, corporation, partnership, or association for the collection of fees, rents, or other returns on behalf of the state or
 the public agency. The contract may provide for the retention of a portion of any fee, rent, or other return as reimbursement for the cost of collection.

(b) Whenever significant savings can be achieved, the department may enter into a contract with any natural person, corporation, partnership, or association for the operation of a reservation system for the state park system and for the collection of state park fees in connection therewith. The contract may provide for the retention of a portion of every fee or the imposition of a surcharge as reimbursement for the cost of providing that service.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1487, Sec. 5.   Effective September 28, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5010.1.5.

(a) On and after January 1, 2024, any contract the department enters into for purposes of managing the department’s reservation system pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5010.1 shall reflect the rules, authorizations, and requirements of this section.

(b) For units of the state park system operated by the department, the department may restrict a person from reserving a site under any of the following circumstances:

(1) For more than seven consecutive nights during peak season.

(2) If the person has occupied a site at the same unit proposed for reservation for more than 30 days in a calendar year.

(3) (A) By using the online reservation system if the person failed to show up for at least three reservations in one calendar year.
